Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 70.58A.200 and 2019 c 148 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Reports of death and fetal death must comply with the requirements of this section.(b) For the purposes of this section, "death" includes "fetal death" as defined in RCW 70.58A.010.(2) A complete report of death must be filed with the local registrar in the local health jurisdiction where the death occurred for each death that occurs in this state. Except for circumstances covered by subsection (7) of this section, the report must be filed within five calendar days after the death or finding of human remains and prior to final disposition of the human remains as required by this section.(a) If the place of death is unknown and the human remains are found in state prior to final disposition, the death must be filed in state and the place where the human remains were found is the place of death.(b) When death occurs in a moving conveyance within or outside the United States and the human remains are first removed from the conveyance in state, the death must be filed in state and the place of death is the place where the remains were removed from the moving conveyance.(c) In all other cases, the place where death is pronounced is the place where death occurred.(d) An approximate date of death may be used if date of death is unknown. If the date cannot be determined by approximation, the date of death must be the date the human remains were found.(3) If the death occurred with medical attendance, a funeral director, funeral establishment, or person having the right to control the disposition of the human remains under RCW 68.50.160 shall:(a) Obtain and enter personal data on the report of death about the decedent from the person best qualified to provide the information;(b) Provide the report of death to the medical certifier within two calendar days after the death or finding of human remains;(c) File the completed report of death with the local registrar; and(d) Obtain a burial-transit permit prior to the disposition of the human remains as required in RCW 70.58A.210.(4) The medical certifier shall:(a) Attest to the cause, date, and time of death; and(b) Return the report of death to the funeral director, funeral establishment, or person having the right to control the disposition of the human remains under RCW 68.50.160 within two calendar days.(5) The report of death may be completed by another individual qualified to be a medical certifier as defined in RCW 70.58A.010 who has access to the medical history of the decedent when:(a) The medical certifier is absent or unable to attest to the cause, date, and time of death; or(b) The death occurred due to natural causes, and the medical certifier gives approval.(6) If the death occurred without medical attendance, the funeral director, funeral establishment, or person having the right to control the disposition of the human remains under RCW 68.50.160 shall provide the report of death to the coroner, medical examiner, or local health officer as allowed by (a) of this subsection.(a) If the death occurred due to natural causes, the coroner, medical examiner, or local health officer shall determine whether to certify the report of death. If the coroner, medical examiner, or local health officer decides to certify the report of death, the person certifying the report shall:(i) Attest to the manner, cause, and date of death without holding an inquest or performing an autopsy or postmortem, based on statements of relatives, persons in attendance during the last sickness, persons present at the time of death, or other persons having adequate knowledge of the facts;(ii) Note that there was no medical attendance at the time of death; and(iii) Return the report of death to the funeral home within two calendar days.(b) If the death appears to be the result of unlawful or unnatural causes, the coroner or medical examiner shall:(i) Attest to the cause, place, and date of death;(ii) Note that there was no medical attendance at the time of death;(iii) Note when the cause of death is pending investigation; and(iv) Return the report of death to the funeral director, funeral establishment, or person having the right to control the disposition of the human remains under RCW 68.50.160 within two calendar days.(7) When there is no funeral director, funeral establishment, or person having the right to control the disposition of human remains under chapter 68.50 RCW, the coroner, medical examiner, or local health officer shall file the completed report of death with the local registrar as required by subsection (2) of this section.(8) When a coroner or medical examiner determines that there is sufficient circumstantial evidence to indicate that an individual has died in the county or in waters contiguous to the county, and that it is unlikely that the body will be recovered, the coroner or medical examiner shall file a report of death, including the cause, place, and date of death, to the extent possible.(9) The coroner or medical examiner in a county in which a decedent was last known to be alive may file a report of death with the local registrar when the county in which the presumed death occurred cannot be determined with certainty. The coroner or medical examiner shall file a report of death, including the cause, place, and date of death, to the extent possible.(10) The coroner or medical examiner having jurisdiction may release information contained in a report of death according to RCW 68.50.300.(11) The local registrar shall:(a) Review filed reports of death to ensure completion in accordance with this chapter;(b) Request missing information or corrections;(c) Ensure issuance of the burial-transit permit as required under RCW 70.58A.210;(d) Register a report of death with the department if it has been completed and submitted in accordance with this section.(12) A medical certifier, coroner, medical examiner, or local health officer shall submit an affidavit of correction to the state registrar to amend the report of death within five calendar days of receipt of an autopsy result or other information that completes or amends the cause of death or corrects demographic or other relevant information from that originally filed with the department.(13) The department may require a medical certifier, coroner, medical examiner, or local health officer to provide additional or clarifying information to properly code and classify cause of death or to properly enter demographic or other relevant information for the decedent.Sec. 2. RCW 70.58A.500 and 2019 c 148 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The state registrar may amend certification items on state vital records.(2) The state registrar may amend a live birth record to change the name of a person born in state:(a) Upon receipt of a complete and signed amendment application with applicable fees and a certified copy of an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, including the name of the person as it appears on the current live birth record and the new name to be designated on the amended live birth record, under RCW 4.24.130; or(b) As authorized under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 3521, the federal witness relocation and protection act.(3) The state registrar shall seal the original live birth record amended under subsection (2)(b) of this section. The sealed record is not subject to public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW except upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction.(4) The state registrar may amend a vital record to change the sex designation of the subject of the record. The state registrar shall include a nonbinary option for sex designation on the record.(5) The state registrar may amend vital records for purposes other than those established in this section.(6) A local or state registrar may amend a report of death to correct demographic information upon receipt of an application from a decedent's immediate family within two years of the decedent's death. For the purposes of this section, "immediate family" means children, stepchildren, grandchildren, great grandchildren, parents, stepparents, grandparents, great grandparents, siblings, aunts, uncles, and a person who was legally married to or in a state registered domestic partnership with the decedent at the time of the decedent's death, and includes adoptive family.(7) The state registrar may deny an application to amend a vital record when:(a) The application is not completed or filed in accordance with this chapter;(b) The state registrar has cause to question the validity or adequacy of the applicant's statements or documentary evidence; or(c) The deficiencies under (a) or (b) of this subsection are not addressed to the satisfaction of the state registrar.(((7)))(8) The state registrar shall provide notice of the denial of an application to amend a vital record and state the reasons for the denial. If the state registrar denies an amendment to a vital record under the provisions of this section, a person may appeal the decision under RCW 70.58A.550.Sec. 3. RCW 18.130.180 and 2024 c 220 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:Except as provided in RCW 18.130.450, the following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute unprofessional conduct for any license holder under the jurisdiction of this chapter:(1) The commission of any act involving moral turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption relating to the practice of the person's profession, whether the act constitutes a crime or not. If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is not a condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction, however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder of the crime described in the indictment or information, and of the person's violation of the statute on which it is based. For the purposes of this section, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for the conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;(2) Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in obtaining a license or in reinstatement thereof;(3) All advertising which is false, fraudulent, or misleading;(4) Incompetence, negligence, or malpractice which results in injury to a patient or which creates an unreasonable risk that a patient may be harmed. The use of a nontraditional treatment by itself shall not constitute unprofessional conduct, provided that it does not result in injury to a patient or create an unreasonable risk that a patient may be harmed;(5) Suspension, revocation, or restriction of the individual's license to practice any health care profession by competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, a certified copy of the order, stipulation, or agreement being conclusive evidence of the revocation, suspension, or restriction;(6) The possession, use, prescription for use, or distribution of controlled substances or legend drugs in any way other than for legitimate or therapeutic purposes, diversion of controlled substances or legend drugs, the violation of any drug law, or prescribing controlled substances for oneself;(7) Violation of any state or federal statute or administrative rule regulating the profession in question, including any statute or rule defining or establishing standards of patient care or professional conduct or practice;(8) Failure to cooperate with the disciplining authority by:(a) Not furnishing any papers, documents, records, or other items;(b) Not furnishing in writing a full and complete explanation covering the matter contained in the complaint filed with the disciplining authority;(c) Not responding to subpoenas issued by the disciplining authority, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena is the accused in the proceeding; or(d) Not providing reasonable and timely access for authorized representatives of the disciplining authority seeking to perform practice reviews at facilities utilized by the license holder;(9) Failure to comply with an order issued by the disciplining authority or a stipulation for informal disposition entered into with the disciplining authority;(10) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to practice when a license is required;(11) Violations of rules established by any health agency;(12) Practice beyond the scope of practice as defined by law or rule;(13) Misrepresentation or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of the business or profession;(14) Failure to adequately supervise auxiliary staff to the extent that the consumer's health or safety is at risk;(15) Engaging in a profession involving contact with the public while suffering from a contagious or infectious disease involving serious risk to public health;(16) Promotion for personal gain of any unnecessary or inefficacious drug, device, treatment, procedure, or service;(17) Conviction of any gross misdemeanor or felony relating to the practice of the person's profession. For the purposes of this subsection, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;(18) The offering, undertaking, or agreeing to cure or treat disease by a secret method, procedure, treatment, or medicine, or the treating, operating, or prescribing for any health condition by a method, means, or procedure which the licensee refuses to divulge upon demand of the disciplining authority;(19) The willful betrayal of a practitioner-patient privilege as recognized by law;(20) Violation of chapter 19.68 RCW or a pattern of violations of RCW 41.05.700(8), 48.43.735(8), 48.49.020, 48.49.030, 71.24.335(8), or 74.09.325(8);(21) Interference with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding by willful misrepresentation of facts before the disciplining authority or its authorized representative, or by the use of threats or harassment against any patient or witness to prevent them from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal action, or by the use of financial inducements to any patient or witness to prevent or attempt to prevent him or her from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding;(22) Current misuse of:(a) Alcohol;(b) Controlled substances; or(c) Legend drugs;(23) Abuse of a client or patient or sexual contact with a client or patient;(24) Acceptance of more than a nominal gratuity, hospitality, or subsidy offered by a representative or vendor of medical or health-related products or services intended for patients, in contemplation of a sale or for use in research publishable in professional journals, where a conflict of interest is presented, as defined by rules of the disciplining authority, in consultation with the department, based on recognized professional ethical standards;(25) Violation of RCW 18.130.420;(26) Performing conversion therapy on a patient under age eighteen;(27) Violation of RCW 18.130.430;(28) Violation of RCW 18.130.460; ((or))(29) Implanting the license holder's own gametes or reproductive material into a patient;(30) Failing to timely produce a report of death as required by RCW 70.58A.200 two or more times in a calendar year.Sec. 4. RCW 43.70.150 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 254 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The secretary of health shall have charge of the state system of registration of births, deaths, fetal deaths, marriages, and decrees of divorce, annulment and separate maintenance, and shall prepare the necessary rules, forms, and blanks for obtaining records, and insure the faithful registration thereof.(2)(a) The secretary of health shall work with insurance regulators and providers in bordering states to have practitioners of health professions in those states qualified to utilize the vital records system operated by the department under chapter 70.58A RCW in order to allow such practitioners of health professions to certify a report of death of a citizen of the state of Washington who dies in such a bordering state.(b) For the purposes of this section:(i) "Health professions" and "practitioner" have the same meaning as in RCW 18.120.020; and(ii) "Vital records system" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.58A.010.Sec. 5. RCW 18.71.080 and 2015 c 252 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Every person licensed to practice medicine in this state shall pay licensing fees and renew his or her license in accordance with administrative procedures and administrative requirements adopted as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.(b) The commission shall request licensees to submit information about their current professional practice at the time of license renewal and licensees must provide the information requested. This information may include practice setting, medical specialty, board certification, or other relevant data determined by the commission.(c) A physician who resides and practices in Washington and obtains or renews a retired active license shall be exempt from licensing fees imposed under this section. The commission may establish rules governing mandatory continuing education requirements which shall be met by physicians applying for renewal of licenses, including a requirement that any physician who in the normal course of practice may be required to certify a report of death under chapter 70.58A RCW has received training on entering information into the vital records system operated by the department of health. The rules shall provide that mandatory continuing education requirements may be met in part by physicians showing evidence of the completion of approved activities relating to professional liability risk management. The number of hours of continuing education for a physician holding a retired active license shall not exceed fifty hours per year.(2) The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the commission with information on methods of recognizing victims of human trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to minor victims. The commission shall disseminate this information to licensees by: Providing the information on the commission's website; including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings attended by organization members; or another distribution method determined by the commission. The commission shall report to the office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to distribute information under this subsection.(3) The commission, in its sole discretion, may permit an applicant who has not renewed his or her license to be licensed without examination if it is satisfied that such applicant meets all the requirements for licensure in this state, and is competent to engage in the practice of medicine.--- END ---